Alabama, session 2026rs, HB661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 1-2-16 of the Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§1-2-16
The poem "Alabama," a gift to the people of the state
from Julia S. Tutwiler, together with the original music
written for such poem by Edna Gockel-Gussen, which music has
been approved and adopted by the Alabama Federation of Music
Clubs, is hereby adopted as the state song of Alabama."
(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the
following:
(1) "Stars Fell on Alabama," with music by Frank
Page 1

(1) "Stars Fell on Alabama," with music by Frank
HB661 INTRODUCED
Perkins and lyrics by Mitchell Parish, has long been
associated with the State of Alabama, reflecting a unique
chapter in the state's cultural history and resonating broadly
with Alabamians and visitors alike.
(2) Elevating "Stars Fell on Alabama" to the status of
the official state song will honor Alabama's musical heritage
and strengthen the state's identity across civic, educational,
and cultural settings.
(b) "Stars Fell on Alabama" is hereby designated and
named the official state song of Alabama.
(c) Any prior statutory designation of a different
official state song is hereby superseded and replaced by the
designation in subsection (b).
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize the reproduction, distribution, or public
performance of the musical composition or lyrics of "Stars
Fell on Alabama" in violation of applicable intellectual
property laws.
(e) This section does not limit counties,
municipalities, or state agencies from recognizing additional
songs or musical works for ceremonial, educational, or tourism
purposes consistent with state law."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2